Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-164.01
Services related to financial statements;
not prohibited.

Nothing in the Public Accountancy Act or
the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act shall be construed
to prohibit any person who does not hold a permit issued under subdivision
(1)(a) of
section 1-136 from preparing, compiling, or signing financial statements if
an accompanying report, letter, or other statement does not express an opinion
or other form of assurance as to the fairness, accuracy, or reliability of
such statements.

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 56;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 35.